Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1572.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-710.03, to read: START_STATUTE15-710.03. Celebrate freedom week; instruction requirements; policies and rules; definition A. Each public school shall observe celebrate freedom week, during which the public school shall include all of the following in each social studies course: 1. For each of grades one through twelve, instruction on the original intent, meaning and importance of the following founding documents and the historical context of each document: (a) The declaration of independence. (b) The United States constitution, including the bill of rights. 2. For each of grades one through twelve, instruction on the relationship between the ideas that are expressed in the declaration of independence and each of the following topics in the history of the United States: (a) The rich diversity of the people of this country as a nation of immigrants. (b) The American revolution. (c) The creation of the United States constitution. (d) The abolitionist movement, including the relationship between the abolitionist movement and the emancipation proclamation and the women's suffrage movement. 3. For each of grades three through twelve, a recitation by students of the passage of the declaration of independence that is described in section 15-203, subsection A, paragraph 26.  A student IS not required to participate in the recitation required by this paragraph if any of the following applies: (a) The student's parent requests in writing that the student be excused. (b) The school determines that the student has a conscientious objection to the recitation. (c) The student's PARENT IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A FOREIGN GOVERNMENT TO WHOM THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT EXTENDS DIPLOMATIC IMMUNITY. B. The state board of education: 1. May adopt rules and policies to implement this section. 2. Shall ensure that public schools do not censor the founding documents described in subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section to exclude religious references. C. For the purposes of this section, "celebrate freedom week" means either: 1. The instructional week that includes September 17. 2. An instructional week designated by the governing body of the public school. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title Section 15-710.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, may be cited as the "Return to Civics Instruction Act".